Connecticut, session 2026, HB05042.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 7-148b of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section and sections 7-148c to 7-148f,
inclusive, as amended by this act, "seasonal basis" means housing
accommodations rented for a period or periods aggregating not more
than one hundred twenty days in any one calendar year, "rental charge"
includes any fee or charge in addition to rent that is imposed or sought
to be imposed upon a tenant by a landlord, [and] "municipality" means
a town, city or consolidated town and city and "major renovations"
means renovations to at least two primary building systems, including,
but not limited to, plumbing, heating and air conditioning, electrical
systems, building envelope and building foundation, which require
significant expenditure relative to the fair market value of the building.
LCO No. 626 1 of 4

Governor's Bill No. 5042
Sec. 2. Section 7-148c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) In determining whether a rental charge or a proposed increase in
a rental charge is so excessive, with due regard to all the circumstances,
as to be harsh and unconscionable, a fair rent commission shall consider
such of the following circumstances as are applicable to the type of
accommodation: (1) The rents charged for the same number of rooms in
other housing accommodations in the same and in other areas of the
municipality; (2) the sanitary conditions existing in the housing
accommodations in question; (3) the number of bathtubs or showers,
flush water closets, kitchen sinks and lavatory basins available to the
occupants thereof; (4) services, furniture, furnishings and equipment
supplied therein; (5) the size and number of bedrooms contained
therein; (6) repairs necessary to make such accommodations reasonably
livable for the occupants accommodated therein; (7) the amount of taxes
and overhead expenses, including debt service, thereof; (8) whether the
accommodations are in compliance with the ordinances of the
municipality and the general statutes relating to health and safety; (9)
the income of the petitioner and the availability of accommodations; (10)
the availability of utilities; (11) damages done to the premises by the
tenant, caused by other than ordinary wear and tear; (12) the amount
and frequency of increases in rental charges; (13) whether, and the
extent to which, the income from an increase in rental charges has been
or will be reinvested in improvements to the accommodations; and (14)
whether ownership of the accommodation has been transferred to a new
owner within the preceding twelve months.
(b) (1) If ownership of the accommodation has been transferred to a
new owner within the preceding twelve months, a fair rent commission
shall determine whether the new owner has completed major
renovations to the accommodation.
(2) If a fair rent commission determines that a new owner has
completed major renovations, it shall assess whether the proposed rent
LCO No. 626 2 of 4

Governor's Bill No. 5042
increase is harsh and unconscionable or unfair and inequitable pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section.
(3) If a fair rent commission determines that a new owner has not
completed major renovations, the commission shall determine any
increase to an existing tenant's rent above the greater of (A) five per cent,
or (B) the increase in the most recent calendar year average in the
consumer price index for urban consumers to be so excessive as to be
harsh and unconscionable.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a fair rent commission
from determining that a proposed rent increase of five per cent or less is
harsh and unconscionable or unfair and inequitable pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 7-148d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) If a commission determines, after a hearing, that the rental
charge or proposed increase in the rental charge for any housing
accommodation is so excessive, based on the standards and criteria set
forth in subsection (a) of section 7-148c, as amended by this act, as to be
harsh and unconscionable, it may order that the rent be limited to such
an amount as it determines to be fair and equitable.
(2) If a commission determines, after a hearing, that the proposed
increase is so excessive, based on the standards and criteria set forth in
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of section 7-148c, as amended by this
act, as to be harsh and unconscionable, it shall order that the rent
increase be limited to the greater of five per cent or the increase in the
most recent calendar year average in the consumer price index for urban
consumers.
(3) If a commission determines, after a hearing, that the housing
accommodation in question fails to comply with any municipal
ordinance or state statute or regulation relating to health and safety, it
LCO No. 626 3 of 4

Governor's Bill No. 5042
may order the suspension of further payment of rent by the tenant until
such time as the landlord makes the necessary changes, repairs or
installations so as to bring such housing accommodation into
compliance with such ordinance, statute or regulation. The rent during
said period shall be paid to the commission to be held in escrow subject
to ordinances or provisions adopted by the town, city or borough.
(b) If the commission determines, after a hearing, that a landlord has
retaliated in any manner against a tenant because the tenant has
complained to the commission, the commission may order the landlord
to cease and desist from such conduct.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148b(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 7-148c
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 7-148d